src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaqg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vaʼg: # Noun 72 'eng /est vagu/fin' - full paradigm
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Nom: [vaʼg, vag]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Gen: [vaʼg, vag]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Par: [vaʼggõ, vaggõ]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Dat: [vaʼggõn, vaggõn]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Ins: [vaʼgkõks, vagkõks]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Ill: [vaʼggõ, vaggõ]
     vaʼg+N+Sg+Ela: [vaʼgstõ, vagstõ]
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Nom: vagūd
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Gen: vagūd
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Par: [vaʼgḑi, vagḑi]
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Dat: vagūdõn
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Ins: vagūdõks
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Ill: [vaʼgži, vagži]
     vaʼg+N+Pl+Ela: [vaʼgšti, vagšti]
